Nebraska, session 109, LB1192.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1192 LB1192
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 13-2603, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
13-2603 For purposes of the Convention Center Facility Financing
Assistance Act:
(1) Applicant means the political subdivision that applies for
assistance under the act;
(2) Associated hotel means any publicly or privately owned facility
in which the public may, for a consideration, obtain sleeping
accommodations and which is located, in whole or in part, within six
hundred yards of an eligible facility, measured from any point of the
exterior perimeter of the eligible facility but not from any parking
facility or other structure, except that if the eligible facility is
within six hundred yards of the State Capitol, the area used in
determining associated hotels shall be one or more contiguous or
noncontiguous areas within the territorial boundaries of the applicant
which are selected by the applicant and which aggregate the same total
amount of square footage that such area would have contained had the
eligible facility not been within six hundred yards of the State Capitol.
The area used in determining associated hotels shall be depicted on a map
submitted pursuant to section 13-2605;
(3) Board means a board consisting of the Governor, the State
Treasurer, the chairperson of the Nebraska Investment Council, the
chairperson of the Nebraska State Board of Public Accountancy, and a
professor of economics on the faculty of a state postsecondary
educational institution appointed to a two-year term on the board by the
Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education. For administrative
and budget purposes only, the board shall be considered part of the
Department of Revenue;
(4) Bond means a general obligation bond, redevelopment bond, lease-
purchase bond, revenue bond, or combination of any such bonds;
(5) Convention and meeting center facility means a temperature-
-2-

LB1192 LB1192
2026 2026
controlled building and personal property primarily used as a convention
and meeting center, including an auditorium, an exhibition hall, a
facility for onsite food preparation and serving, an onsite, directly
connected parking facility for the use of the convention and meeting
center facility, a nearby parking facility for the use of the convention
and meeting center facility, and an onsite administrative office of the
convention and meeting center facility;
(6)(a) Eligible facility means any publicly owned convention and
meeting center facility approved for state assistance on or before June
1, 2007, any publicly owned sports arena facility attached to such
convention and meeting center facility, or any publicly owned convention
and meeting center facility or publicly owned sports arena facility
acquired, constructed, improved, or equipped after June 1, 2007; and
(b) Beginning with applications for financial assistance received on
or after February 1, 2008, eligible facility does not include any
publicly owned sports arena facility with a seating capacity of greater
than sixteen thousand seats unless such facility is located in a city of
the primary class;
(7) General obligation bond means any bond or refunding bond issued
by a political subdivision and which is payable exclusively from the
proceeds of an ad valorem tax;
(8) Maximum aggregate appropriation means (a) one hundred fifty
million dollars for any one approved project, but not more than the total
cost of acquiring, constructing, improving, repairing, replacing,
financing, or equipping the eligible facilities of the political
subdivision, or (b) for an eligible facility located within six hundred
yards of the State Capitol, the total cost of acquiring, constructing,
improving, repairing, replacing, financing, and equipping such facility,
but only to the extent the cost of acquiring, constructing, improving,
repairing, replacing, and equipping such facility does not exceed one
hundred fifty million dollars;
-3-

LB1192 LB1192
2026 2026
(9) Nearby parking facility means any parking lot, parking garage,
or other parking structure that is not directly connected to a convention
and meeting center facility but which is located, in whole or in part,
within six hundred yards of a convention and meeting center facility,
measured from any point of the exterior perimeter of such facility but
not from any other parking facility or other structure;
(10) Nearby retailer means a retailer as defined in section
77-2701.32 that is located, in whole or in part, within six hundred yards
of an eligible facility the application for which is approved on or after
June 7, 2023, measured from any point of the exterior perimeter of the
eligible facility but not from any parking facility or other structure,
except that if the eligible facility is within six hundred yards of the
State Capitol, the area used in determining nearby retailers shall be one
or more contiguous or noncontiguous areas within the territorial
boundaries of the applicant which are selected by the applicant and which
aggregate the same total amount of square footage that such area would
have contained had the eligible facility not been within six hundred
yards of the State Capitol. The area used in determining nearby retailers
shall be depicted on a map submitted pursuant to section 13-2605;
(11) Political subdivision means any local governmental body formed
and organized under state law and any joint entity or joint public agency
created under state law to act on behalf of political subdivisions which
has statutory authority to issue general obligation bonds;
(12) Revenue bond means any bond or refunding bond issued by a
political subdivision which is limited or special rather than a general
obligation bond of the political subdivision and which is not payable
from the proceeds of an ad valorem tax; and
(13) Sports arena facility means any enclosed temperature-controlled
building primarily used for competitive sports, including arenas,
dressing and locker facilities, concession areas, parking facilities, and
onsite administrative offices connected with operating the facilities.
-4-

LB1192 LB1192
2026 2026
Sec. 2. Original section 13-2603, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, is repealed.
-5-